Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.546

Statewide sexual assault kit tracking system—Participation by bureau of forensic laboratory services.

The Washington state patrol bureau of forensic laboratory services shall participate in the statewide sexual assault kit tracking system established in RCW 43.43.545 for the purpose of tracking the status of all sexual assault kits in the custody of the Washington state patrol and other entities contracting with the Washington state patrol. The Washington state patrol bureau of forensic laboratory services shall begin full participation in the system according to the implementation schedule established by the Washington state patrol.

[ 2016 c 173 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2016 c 173: See note following RCW 43.43.545.